Montana, session 2025, HB862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of funds. By July 1, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer
$100 from the general fund to the fire suppression account established in 76-13-150.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 862